Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.250

Emergency expenditures.

Whenever an emergency shall arise necessitating an expenditure for the preservation of peace, health or safety, or for the carrying on of the necessary work required by law of any state agency for which insufficient or no appropriations have been made, the head of such agency shall submit to the governor, duplicate copies of a sworn statement, setting forth the facts constituting the emergency and the estimated amount of money required therefor. If the governor approves such estimate in whole or in part, the governor shall indorse on each copy of the statement the governor's approval, together with a statement of the amount approved as an allocation from any appropriation available for allocation for emergency purposes and transmit one copy to the head of the agency thereby authorizing the emergency expenditures.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 83 s 1.]